public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.aff
# Diŧionario de lengua vèneta
#
# Venetan hunspell affix file
# Copyright (C) 2016 Mauro Trevisan
#
# This file is distributed under GPL license.
#
# This file is part of the "diŧionario de lengua vèneta".
#
# The "diŧionario de lengua vèneta" is free software; you can redistribute
# it and/or modify it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as
# published by the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the
# License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# The "diŧionario de lengua vèneta" is distributed in the hope that it
# will be useful, but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied
# warranty of MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public
# License along with the "diŧionario de lengua vèneta", if not,
# see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

NAME Diŧionario de lengua vèneta
VERSION 1.3.3 (2016/06/05)
HOME http://parnodexmentegar.orgfree.com/
LANG vec

SET UTF-8


TRY eaoinrtlƚsdkpvmuèxgfàòbíhéŧójɉñcúSđLȽIPETKKAMDNFBRJGCOUĐXÀÈŦɈÒÑÍÉÓÚ-'‘’

KEY esdr|redft|trfg|uhji|iujko|oiklp|polòè|èpòà|as|saedx|dserfcx|fdrtgvc|gfthbv|hgujnb|jhuikmn|kjiolm|lkopò|òlpèà-|àòèù-|ùà|xsdc|cxdfv|vcfgb|bvghn|nbhjm|mnjk|ìè'

#wORDCHARS '‘’

# workaround to match words that begins or ends with an apostrophe like 'lora or indo'
#IGNORE '


# avoid wrong spelling of letterwords
KEEPCASE Z # km, GHz, DVD, ...

# affix rules can strip full words, not only one less characters
FULLSTRIP

# switch off default word break at hyphens and n-dashes
BREAK 0

# suggest the right forms for words which incorrectly choose the wrong letter from a related set more than once in a word
MAP 5
MAP eéè
MAP aáà
MAP iíì
MAP oóò
MAP uúù

# replace input characters
ICONV 33
ICONV ‒ -
ICONV – -
ICONV — -
ICONV ― -
ICONV dh đ
ICONV Dh Đ
ICONV fh f
ICONV Fh F
ICONV jh ɉ
ICONV Jh Ɉ
ICONV lh ƚ
ICONV Lh Ƚ
ICONV nh ñ
ICONV Nh Ñ
ICONV th ŧ
ICONV Th Ŧ
ICONV xc sc
ICONV xf sf
ICONV xk sk
ICONV xp sp
ICONV xt st
ICONV sm xm
ICONV sn xn
ICONV sñ xñ
ICONV sb xb
ICONV sd xd
ICONV sg xg
ICONV sj xj
ICONV sɉ xɉ
ICONV ss xs
ICONV sv xv
ICONV sr xr
ICONV sl xl

# frequently switched character groups
REP 10
REP a à
REP e è
REP e é
REP i í
REP ì í
REP o ò
REP o ó
REP u ú
REP ù ú
REP ' _


FLAG UTF-8

# vèrbi -àr, -ér, -<is>ír, -ír, -<is>ír/-ír
# themeT1 + r/AahE, themeT1 + r/AbE, themeT1 + r/AdE, themeT1 + r/AeE, themeT1 + r/AfE
SFX A Y 62
SFX A 0 à/FJLN [aei]r
SFX A 0 àe/F [aei]r
SFX A 0 àvelo/B [aei]r
SFX A 0 àveƚo/B [aei]r
SFX A 0 è/JL [aei]r
SFX A 0 èmi/K [aei]r
SFX A 0 é/P [aei]r
SFX A 0 émoi/M [aei]r
SFX A 0 ésimo/L [aei]r
SFX A 0 ésimoi/M [aei]r
SFX A 0 ésitu/O [aei]r
SFX A 0 éu/Q [aei]r
SFX A 0 ía/FJLN [aei]r
SFX A 0 íami/K [aei]r
SFX A 0 íatu/O [aei]r
SFX A 0 íe/FJL [aei]r
SFX A 0 íelo/B [aei]r
SFX A 0 íeƚo/B [aei]r
SFX A 0 íemi/K [aei]r
SFX A 0 ò/JL [aei]r
SFX A 0 òmi/K [aei]r
SFX A 0 alo/B [aei]r
SFX A 0 aƚo/B [aei]r
SFX A 0 ami/K [aei]r
SFX A 0 atu/O [aei]r
SFX A 0 ave/FS [aei]r
SFX A 0 e [aei]r
SFX A 0 emo/EL [aei]r
SFX A 0 en/L [aei]r
SFX A 0 eni/M [aei]r
SFX A 0 ense [aei]r
SFX A 0 esi/P [aei]r
SFX A 0 esiu/Q [aei]r
SFX A 0 ié/P [aei]r
SFX A 0 iéu/Q [aei]r
SFX A 0 ion/EL [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX A 0 ioni/M [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX A 0 ionme/G [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX A 0 isen/L [aei]r
SFX A 0 iseni/M [aei]r
SFX A 0 isense [aei]r
SFX A 0 isié/P [aei]r
SFX A 0 isiéu/Q [aei]r
SFX A 0 ision/L [aei]r
SFX A 0 isioni/M [aei]r
SFX A 0 isionse [aei]r
SFX A 0 ison/L [aei]r
SFX A 0 isoni/M [aei]r
SFX A 0 isonse [aei]r
SFX A 0 me/G [aei]r
SFX A 0 mene/G [aei]r
SFX A 0 on/EL [aei]r
SFX A 0 oni/M [aei]r
SFX A 0 onme/G [aei]r
SFX A r ge/G [aei]r
SFX A r gene/G [aei]r
SFX A r ndo/E [aei]r
SFX A r sto/BI [aei]r
SFX A r va/FJLP [aei]r
SFX A r ve/JL [aei]r
SFX A r vi/NP [aei]r
SFX A r vo/JL [aei]r

# vèrbi -àr
# themeT1 + r/AahE
SFX a Y 12
SFX a ar àa/FJLP ar
SFX a ar àe/JL ar
SFX a ar ài/NP ar
SFX a ar ào/JL ar
SFX a ar àsitu/O ar
SFX a ar éa/FJLP ar
SFX a ar ée/JL ar
SFX a ar éi/NP ar
SFX a ar éndome/G ar
SFX a ar éndomene/G ar
SFX a ar éo/JL ar
SFX a ar éu/Q ar

# vèrbi -ér
# themeT1 + r/AbiE
# themeT8 + o/bEJL
SFX b Y 160
SFX b 0 í/P er
SFX b 0 íe/FJL er
SFX b 0 ímoi/M er
SFX b 0 íu/Q er
SFX b 0 imo/EL er
SFX b 0 me/G er
SFX b er é/FP er
SFX b er éa/FJLP er
SFX b er éami/K er
SFX b er éau/Q er
SFX b er ée/JL er
SFX b er éelo/B er
SFX b er éeƚo/B er
SFX b er éemi/K er
SFX b er éi/NP er
SFX b er éimo/L er
SFX b er éimoi/M er
SFX b er éitu/O er
SFX b er émoi/M er
SFX b er émome/G er
SFX b er émomene/G er
SFX b er éndome/G er
SFX b er éndomene/G er
SFX b er éo/JL er
SFX b er éomi/K er
SFX b er érmene/G er
SFX b er ésimo er
SFX b er éu/Q er
SFX b er évami/K er
SFX b er évau/Q er
SFX b er évelo/B er
SFX b er éveƚo/B er
SFX b er évemi/K er
SFX b er évimo/L er
SFX b er évimoi/M er
SFX b er évitu/O er
SFX b er évomi/K er
SFX b er í/FP er
SFX b er ímoi/M er
SFX b er íu/Q er
SFX b er ú [^u]er
SFX b er úo/B [^u]er
SFX b er arà/FJLN er
SFX b er aràe/F er
SFX b er aràvelo/B er
SFX b er aràveƚo/B er
SFX b er aràvemi/K er
SFX b er arè/JL er
SFX b er arèmi/K er
SFX b er aré/P er
SFX b er arémoi/M er
SFX b er arémome/G er
SFX b er arémomene/G er
SFX b er arésimo/L er
SFX b er arésimoi/M er
SFX b er arésitu/O er
SFX b er aréu/Q er
SFX b er arí/P er
SFX b er aría/FJLN er
SFX b er aríami/K er
SFX b er aríatu/O er
SFX b er aríe/FJL er
SFX b er aríelo/B er
SFX b er aríeƚo/B er
SFX b er aríemi/K er
SFX b er arímoi/M er
SFX b er arísitu/O er
SFX b er aríu/Q er
SFX b er arò/JL er
SFX b er aròmi/K er
SFX b er aralo/B er
SFX b er araƚo/B er
SFX b er arami/K er
SFX b er aratu/O er
SFX b er arave/FS er
SFX b er aremo/EL er
SFX b er aren/L er
SFX b er areni/M er
SFX b er arense er
SFX b er aresi/P er
SFX b er aresiu/Q er
SFX b er arié/P er
SFX b er ariéu/Q er
SFX b er arimo/L er
SFX b er arion/L er
SFX b er arioni/M er
SFX b er arionse er
SFX b er arisen/L er
SFX b er ariseni/M er
SFX b er arisense er
SFX b er arisié/P er
SFX b er arisiéu/Q er
SFX b er arisi/P er
SFX b er arision/L er
SFX b er arisioni/M er
SFX b er arisionse er
SFX b er arisiu/Q er
SFX b er arison/L er
SFX b er arisoni/M er
SFX b er arisonse er
SFX b er aron/EL er
SFX b er aroni/M er
SFX b er aronme/G er
SFX b er ié/P er
SFX b er iéu/Q er
SFX b er iede/P er
SFX b er iege/P er
SFX b er ime/H er
SFX b er imo/EL er
SFX b er ion/EL [^cijɉñ]er
SFX b er ioni/M [^cijɉñ]er
SFX b er ionme/G [^cijɉñ]er
SFX b er isen/L er
SFX b er iseni/M er
SFX b er isense er
SFX b er isié/P er
SFX b er isiede/P er
SFX b er isiege/P er
SFX b er ision/L er
SFX b er isioni/M er
SFX b er isionse er
SFX b er ison/L er
SFX b er isoni/M er
SFX b er isonse er
SFX b er iven/L er
SFX b er iveni/M er
SFX b er ivense er
SFX b er ivié/P er
SFX b er iviéu/Q er
SFX b er ivion/L er
SFX b er ivioni/M er
SFX b er ivionse er
SFX b er ivon/L er
SFX b er ivoni/M er
SFX b er ivonse er
SFX b er on/EL er
SFX b er oni/M er
SFX b er onme/G er
SFX b er udo/B [^u]er
SFX b o a/E o
SFX b o e/EFIJKL o
SFX b o elo/B o
SFX b o eƚo/B o
SFX b o emi/K o
SFX b o i/EFN o
SFX b o ime/H o
SFX b o itu/O o
SFX b o omi/K o
SFX b r de er
SFX b r ge er
SFX b r me/H er
SFX b r mo/L er
SFX b r n/L er
SFX b r ni/M er
SFX b r nse er
SFX b r nte/I er
SFX b r se/IT er
SFX b uer ú uer
SFX b uer úo/B uer
SFX b uer udo/B uer
