public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.dic
arđiñar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inarkar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
'ver/AbE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
aer/AbE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ào/biJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:aver st:aer
reaer/AbE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
reao/biJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:reaver st:reaer
gao/biJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:gaver
xbakanar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xbalansar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
barbotar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
bastardar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xbarlefar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
bianar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inbogar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
abonbar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inbosar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
brasar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
brokoƚar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inbusolar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
incepar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
deñar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
doler/AbE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
doƚer/AbE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inđalar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
davariar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ekonomiđar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
fatalixar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
renfasar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
fievarar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
desfiubar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
fondar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
desfregoƚar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
furegar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xgorgonar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ingrapejar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intimar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
invarnar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inkamixar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
kanopar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
kauxar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
kogoƚar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
koñer/AbE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
skorsiđar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
kriveƚar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ƚanpixar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ƚesar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xloxar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
permaner/AbE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
parmaner/AbE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
remaner/AbE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
mantexar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
intarmexar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
mokolar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
multar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
oblegar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
orxar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
parer/AbE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
konparo/bEIJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:konparer
parexar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
pasteđar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
petufiar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inpiagar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
pòo/bEIJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:poer
pòdo/bEIJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:poder
spopoƚar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
trasportar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
pòso/bEIJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:poser
regalixar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
regaƚixar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sào/bEIJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:saer
strasào/bEIJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:strasaer
salmastrar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
saxar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sifoƚar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
deskarselar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
solo/bEIJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:soler
sorsedar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
despoɉar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
stomegar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
takolar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
destegolar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
toler/AbkE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
tòlo/bkIJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:toler
toƚo/bEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:toƚer
retòlo/bkJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:retoler
retòƚo/bEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:retoƚer
intorsar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
trateđar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sertar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
ŧikolar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
valo/bEIJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:valer
vaƚo/bEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:vaƚer
prevalo/bEIJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:prevaler
prevaƚo/bEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:prevaƚer
sprevalo/bEIJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:sprevaler
sprevaƚo/bEJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:sprevaƚer
soveñir/AeE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
inverdelar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
voƚer/AbkE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
'olo/bEIJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:'oler
malvoƚer/AbkE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
revoƚer/AbkE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xborñar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
xmeriliar/AahE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
